Tennessee, session 114, HB0483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-103(5), is amended by deleting
"ninety (90) days" and substituting "one hundred twenty (120) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0483
000402
- 1 -